Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 2. Building Energy Labeling and Benchmarking

§ 61.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Benchmarking” means measuring the energy performance of a single building or portfolio of buildings over time in comparison to other similar buildings or to modeled simulations of a reference building built to a specific standard such as an energy code.

“Commercial Working Group” means the Commercial and Multiunit Building Energy Labeling Working Group established by subsection 62(b) of this title.

“Commission” means the Public Utility Commission.

“Department” means the Department of Public Service.

“Distribution company” means a company under the jurisdiction of the Commission that distributes electricity or natural gas for consumption by end users.

“Energy efficiency utility” means an energy efficiency entity appointed under subdivision 209(d)(2) of this title.

“Energy label” means the visual presentation in a consistent format of an energy rating for a building and any other supporting and comparative information. The label may be provided as a paper certificate or made available online, or both.

“Energy rating” means a simplified mechanism to convey a building’s energy performance. The rating may be based on the operation of the building or modeled based on the building’s assets.

“Home energy assessor” means an individual who assigns buildings a home energy performance score using a scoring system based on the energy rating.

“Multiunit building” means a building that contains more than one independent dwelling unit or separate space for independent commercial use, or both.

“Residential Working Group” means the Residential Building Energy Labeling Working Group established by subsection 62(a) of this title.

“Unit holder” means the tenant or owner of an independent dwelling unit or separate space for independent commercial use within a multiunit building.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 62

, § 12.

§ 62.
Repealed. 2019, No. 62, § 15(c), effective June 30, 2021.

§ 63.
Multiunit buildings; access to aggregated data.

Obligation; aggregation and release of data. On request of the owner of a multiunit building or the owner’s designated agent, each distribution company and energy efficiency utility shall aggregate monthly energy usage data in its possession for the unit holders in the building and release the aggregated data to the owner or agent. The aggregated data shall be anonymized.

Under this section, the obligation to aggregate and release data shall accrue when the owner or agent:

Certifies that the request is made for the purpose of benchmarking or preparing an energy label for the building.

With respect to a multiunit building that has at least four unit holders, provides documentation certifying that, at least 14 days prior to submission of the request, each unit holder was notified that the energy usage data of the holder was to be requested and that this notice gave each unit holder an opportunity to opt out of the energy use aggregation. The owner or agent shall identify to the distribution company or energy efficiency utility requesting the data each unit holder that opted out.

With respect to a multiunit building that has fewer than four unit holders, provides an energy usage data release authorization from each unit holder.

A unit holder may authorize release of the holder’s energy usage data by signature on a release authorization form or clause in a lease signed by the unit holder. The provisions of

9 V.S.A. § 276

(recognition of electronic records and signatures) shall apply to release authorization forms under this subsection.

After consultation with the Commercial Working Group, the Commissioner of Public Service shall prescribe forms for requests and release authorizations under this subsection. The request form shall include the required certification.

Response period. A distribution company or energy efficiency utility shall release the aggregated energy use data to the building owner or designated agent within 30 days of its receipt of a request that meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

The aggregation shall exclude energy usage data for each unit holder who opted out or, in the case of a multiunit building with fewer than four unit holders, each unit holder for which a signed release authorization was not received.

A distribution company may refer a complete request under subsection (a) of this section to an energy efficiency utility that possesses the requisite data, unless the data is to be used for a benchmarking program to be conducted by the company.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 62

, § 12.